src/morphology/affixes/postpositions.lexc
!Postpositions

LEXICON Postp
+Po: # ;

!LEXICON Pp         
!+Pp:   SxAdv       ;

!LEXICON PpCx        
!+Pp:   SxPpCx       ;

!LEXICON PpPx        
!+Pp:   SxPpPx       ;

!LEXICON PpPx+       
!+Pp:   SxPpPx+       ;

!LEXICON PpUndecl       
!+Pp:   SxPpUndecl       ;




!Postpositions

!LEXICON SxAdv       !Tämä jo adverbeissa

!LEXICON SxPpCx      
!$x  WordEnd	;

!LEXICON SxPpPx       
!$x  WordEnd	;

!LEXICON SxPpPx+       
!$x  WordEnd	;

!LEXICON SxPpUndecl       
!$x  WordEnd	;
